Hawaii statutes.
§386-79 Medical examination by employer's
physician. After an injury and during the period of disability, the
employee, whenever ordered by the director of labor and industrial relations,
shall submit to examination, at reasonable times and places, by a duly
qualified physician or surgeon designated and paid by the employer. The
employee shall have the right to have a physician or surgeon designated and
paid by the employee present at the examination, which right, however, shall
not be construed to deny to the employer's physician the right to visit the
injured employee at all reasonable times and under all reasonable conditions
during total disability.

If an employee refuses to submit to, or in any
way obstructs such examination, the employee's right to claim compensation for
the work injury shall be suspended until the refusal or obstruction ceases and
no compensation shall be payable for the period during which the refusal or
obstruction continues.

In cases where the employer is dissatisfied
with the progress of the case or where major and elective surgery, or either,
is contemplated, the employer may appoint a physician or surgeon of the
employer's choice who shall examine the injured employee and make a report to
the employer. If the employer remains dissatisfied, this report may be
forwarded to the director.

Employer requested examinations under this
section shall not exceed more than one per case unless good and valid reasons
exist with regard to the medical progress of the employee's treatment. The
cost of conducting the ordered medical examination shall be limited to the
complex consultation charges governed by the medical fee schedule established
pursuant to section 386-21(c). [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-78; HRS
§386-79; gen ch 1985; am L 1995, c 234, §13; am L 1996, c 260, §4]

Case Notes

Labor and industrial relations appeals board's failure to
apply this section, as amended, in its decision and order constituted harmless
error, where record reflected that the reason for the 1995 medical examination
ordered by the director related directly "to the medical progress of
employee's treatment" in accordance with the mandate of this section as
amended. 94 H. 487, 17 P.3d 219 (2001).

Cited: 760 F. Supp. 2d 1005 (2010).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next